Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.380

Safe storage of firearms expansion encouraged—No special relationship created by dealer storage.

(1) In order to better prevent suicide by veterans, military members, and their families, an expansion of safe storage of firearms and reduced access to lethal means in the community is encouraged.

(2) A dealer who provides a service of allowing a person to temporarily store a firearm on the dealer's premises in a storage locker, box, or container that is locked and not accessible to the dealer does not thereby create a special relationship, for civil liability purposes, between the dealer and the person who temporarily stores the firearm on the dealer's premises.

[ 2022 c 191 s 10.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 191: See note following RCW 43.60A.260.